Illinois, session 104th, SB2691.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Nondriving Factors in Insurance Rate-Setting Study Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that: 7        (1) Automobile and homeowners insurance premiums play 8    a critical role in protecting Illinois families and 9    communities. 10        (2) There is growing concern that nondriving factors, 11    such as a person's credit score, occupation, education 12    level, and other socioeconomic criteria, may contribute to 13    inequitable rate-setting practices. 14        (3) A comprehensive data-driven analysis is necessary 15    to evaluate the fairness and consumer impact of these 16    practices and to determine whether legislative or 17    regulatory reforms are warranted. 18    Section 10. Department of Insurance study. 19    (a) The Department of Insurance shall conduct a 20comprehensive study of the use of nondriving factors in the 21setting of automobile and homeowners insurance premiums in 22Illinois.  SB2691- 2 -LRB104 15273 BAB 28426 b1    (b) The study shall include, but not be limited to: 2        (1) An examination of how a person's credit score, 3    occupation, education level, and other nondriving factors 4    are currently used by insurers. 5        (2) An assessment of the relationship between these 6    factors and the cost of claims loss ratios and the actual 7    risk of insured parties. 8        (3) A review of the extent to which reliance on 9    nondriving factors may disproportionately impact 10    low-income individuals, communities of color, veterans, 11    seniors, or other protected classes. 12        (4) A comparative analysis of practices in other 13    states, including any restrictions or prohibitions on the 14    use of nondriving factors. 15        (5) Recommendations for statutory or regulatory 16    changes to ensure that insurance rates are fair, 17    equitable, and based primarily on risk of loss. 18    Section 15. Reporting requirement. By January 1, 2027, the 19Department of Insurance shall prepare and submit a report of 20its findings and recommendations to the President of the 21Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the 22Minority Leader of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the 23House of Representatives. 24    Section 90. Repeal. This Act is repealed on January 1,   SB2691- 3 -LRB104 15273 BAB 28426 b12028. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.